Hawaii statutes.
§28-11 Investigators; appointment and
powers. (a) The attorney general shall appoint and commission one or more
investigators as the exigencies of the public service may require. Persons
appointed and commissioned under this section shall have and may exercise all
of the powers and authority and the benefits and privileges of a police officer
or of a deputy sheriff. These investigators shall consist of personnel whose
primary duty will be to conduct investigations as directed by the attorney
general.

(b) The attorney general may also appoint persons
whose primary function shall be to provide security coverage for the governor
and other public officials of this State, to be known as security
investigators, who shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of
the investigators appointed under subsection (a). When not providing security
coverage for the governor or other public officials, the security investigators
shall conduct other investigations as directed by the attorney general. The positions
of security investigators may be exempt from chapter 76. [L 1951, c 163, §1; am
L 1951, c 264, §2; RL 1955, §30-11; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §28-11; am L 1973,
c 48, §1; am L 1981, c 161, §1; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11;
am L 2006, c 300, §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next